Colorado statutes. TITLE 1 Elections
PART 6
POLITICAL PARTY DESIGNATION FOR PRIMARY ELECTION

1-4-601. Designation of candidates for primary election - definition.

Assemblies of the major political parties may make assembly designations of candidates for nomination on the primary election ballot. Except as provided in subsection (1)(b) of this section, an assembly shall be held no later than seventy-three days preceding the primary election.

Repealed.

(1.5) To be named as a candidate for designation by assembly, a person must provide notice as follows no less than thirty days before the assembly, unless otherwise provided by party rules:

A person seeking designation by a county assembly must provide notice to the county chair;

A person seeking designation by a multi-county district assembly must provide notice to the multi-county district chair and the state chair; and

A person seeking designation by the state assembly must provide notice to the state chair.

An assembly must take no more than two ballots for party candidates for each office to be filled at the next general election. Every candidate receiving thirty percent or more of the votes of all duly accredited assembly delegates who are present and voting on that office must be certified by affidavit of the presiding officer and secretary of the assembly. If no candidate receives thirty percent or more of the votes of all duly accredited assembly delegates who are present and voting, a second ballot must be cast on all the candidates for that office. If on the second ballot no candidate receives thirty percent or more of the votes cast, the two candidates receiving the highest number of votes must be certified as candidates for that office by the assembly. The certificate of designation by assembly must state the name of the office for which each person is a candidate and the candidate's name and address, must designate in not more than three words the name of the political party which the candidate represents, and must certify that the candidate has been a member of the political party for the period of time required by party rule or by subsection (4) of this section if the party has no such rule. The candidate's affiliation, as shown in the statewide voter registration system, is prima facie evidence of political party membership. The certificate of designation must indicate the order of the vote received at the assembly by candidates for each office, but no assembly shall declare that any one candidate has received the nomination of the assembly. The certificate of designation must be filed in accordance with section 1-4-604. If two or more candidates receiving designation under this subsection (2) have received an equal number of votes, the order of certification of designation is determined by lot by the candidates. The assembly shall select a vacancy committee for vacancies in designation or nomination only.

Repealed.

Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary, a delegate may participate in the assembly remotely, including casting the delegate's vote by e-mail, mail, telephone, or through an internet-based application if allowed by the party's rules.

Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection (3), no later than four days after the adjournment of the assembly, each candidate designated by assembly shall file a written acceptance with the officer with whom the certificate of designation is filed. This acceptance may be transmitted by facsimile transmission. If the acceptance is transmitted by facsimile transmission, the original acceptance must also be filed and postmarked no later than ten days after the adjournment of the assembly. The acceptance shall state the candidate's name in the form in which it is to appear on the ballot. The name may include one nickname, if the candidate regularly uses the nickname and the nickname does not include any part of a political party name. If an acceptance is not filed within the specified time, the candidate shall be deemed to have declined the designation; except that the candidate shall not be deemed to have declined the designation and shall be included on the primary ballot if late filing of an acceptance is caused by the failure to timely file a certificate of designation or the failure to file such acceptance with such certificate of designation, as required by section 1-4-604 (1)(a).

The written acceptance of a candidate nominated by assembly for any national or state office or for member of the general assembly, district attorney, or district office greater than a county office shall be filed by the presiding officer or secretary of such assembly with the certificate of designation of such assembly, as required by section 1-4-604 (1)(a). Nothing in this paragraph (b) shall prohibit a candidate from filing an acceptance of nomination directly with the officer with whom the certificate of designation is filed following written notice of such filing by the candidate to the presiding officer of the political party holding such assembly.

No person is eligible for designation by assembly as a candidate for nomination at any primary election unless the person was affiliated with the political party holding the assembly, as shown in the statewide voter registration system, no later than the first business day of the January immediately preceding the primary election, unless otherwise provided by party rules.

Repealed.

As used in this section, "political party" means a major political party as defined in section 1-1-104 (22).

Source:

L. 80:

Entire article R&RE, p. 326, § 1, effective January 1, 1981.

L. 81:

(1) and (3) amended, p. 310, § 1, effective March 27.

L. 83:

(2) amended, p. 352, § 16, effective July 1.

L. 87:

(2) amended, p. 286, § 8, effective June 26.

L. 88:

(4) amended, p. 294, § 3, effective May 29.

L. 89:

(4)(b) repealed, p. 314, § 3, effective April 12; (1) and (2) amended, p. 302, § 7, effective May 9.

L. 92:

Entire part amended, p. 678, § 6, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 94:

(4)(a) amended, p. 1153, § 13, effective July 1.

L. 98:

(5) added, p. 257, § 7, effective April 13.

L. 99:

(3) amended, p. 285, § 1, effective April 13; (1) and (3) amended, p. 762, § 20, effective May 20; (2) amended, p. 160, § 9, effective August 4.

L. 2005:

(1) amended, p. 1398, § 14, effective June 6; (1) amended, p. 1433, § 14, effective June 6.

L. 2010:

(2) and (4)(a) amended, (HB 10-1271), ch. 324, p. 1502, § 3, effective May 27.

L. 2011:

(1) amended, (SB 11-189), ch. 243, p. 1063, § 7, effective May 27.

L. 2012:

(3)(a) amended, (HB 12-1292), ch. 181, p. 679, § 11, effective May 17.

L. 2016:

(2) and (4)(a) amended, (SB 16-142), ch. 173, p. 575, § 28, effective May 18.

L. 2020:

(1) and (2) amended, (HB 20-1359), ch. 23, p. 83, § 3, effective March 16.

L. 2021:

(1.5) and (2)(c) added, (SB 21-250), ch. 282, p. 1639, § 15, effective June 21.

1-4-602. Delegates to party assemblies - definition.

Except as provided in subsection (1)(a)(IV) of this section, county assemblies must be held no later than twenty-one days after precinct caucuses. The county central committee or executive committee shall fix the number of delegates from each precinct to participate in the county assembly pursuant to the procedure for the selection of delegates contained in the state party central committee's bylaws or rules. The persons receiving the highest number of votes at the precinct caucus shall be the delegates to the county assembly from the precinct. If two or more candidates receive an equal number of votes for the last available place in the election of delegates to county assemblies at the precinct caucuses, the delegate must be determined by lot by the candidates. Except as provided in subsections (2) and (6) of this section, delegates to all other party assemblies shall be selected by the respective county assemblies from among the members of the county assemblies pursuant to the state party central committee's bylaws or rules.
(1) (a) (I) Except as provided in subsection (1)(a)(IV) of this section, county assemblies must be held no later than twenty-one days after precinct caucuses. The county central committee or executive committee shall fix the number of delegates from each precinct to participate in the county assembly pursuant to the procedure for the selection of delegates contained in the state party central committee's bylaws or rules. The persons receiving the highest number of votes at the precinct caucus shall be the delegates to the county assembly from the precinct. If two or more candidates receive an equal number of votes for the last available place in the election of delegates to county assemblies at the precinct caucuses, the delegate must be determined by lot by the candidates. Except as provided in subsections (2) and (6) of this section, delegates to all other party assemblies shall be selected by the respective county assemblies from among the members of the county assemblies pursuant to the state party central committee's bylaws or rules.

and (III) Repealed.

(IV) If allowed by the party's rules, a county assembly may be held on the same day as precinct caucuses on a date allowed pursuant to section 1-3-102 (1)(a)(I). The county central committee or executive committee shall notify the secretary of state and the clerk and recorder of each county of the decision on or before January 2 of the year in which the election will be held.

In determining the number of delegates from precincts which have been created or split since the previous general election, the county central committee or executive committee may allocate delegates based on the number of registered voters affiliated with the political party, pursuant to the state party central committee's bylaws or rules.

In each state senatorial and representative district comprised of a portion of one county only, persons elected at precinct caucuses as delegates to the county assemblies shall serve also as delegates to the senatorial and representative district assemblies.

In each state senatorial and representative district comprised of one or more whole counties and a portion of one or more counties or comprised of portions of two or more counties, the number of delegates to the senatorial and representative district assemblies shall be apportioned among the counties by the party's senatorial or representative central committee according to the vote in the county or portion of a county for that party's candidate for governor or president in the last general election, pursuant to the state party central committee's bylaws or rules.

All questions regarding the qualifications of any delegate or the conduct of any precinct caucus at which the delegates were voted on shall be determined by the credentials committees of the respective party county, representative, and senatorial assemblies.

All places established for holding precinct caucuses shall be designated by a sign conspicuously posted no later than twelve days before the precinct caucuses. The sign shall be substantially in the following form: "Precinct caucus place for precinct no. ......" The lettering on the sign and the precinct number shall be black on a white background with all letters and numerals at least four inches in height. Any precinct caucus subsequently removed and held in a place other than the place stated on the sign is null and void.

Repealed.

As used in this section, "delegate" means a person who is a registered elector, has been a resident of the precinct for twenty-two days prior to the caucus, and has been affiliated with the political party holding the caucus for at least twenty-two days, as shown in the statewide voter registration system; except that any registered elector who has attained the age of eighteen years during the twenty-two days immediately preceding the caucus or any registered elector who has become a naturalized citizen during the twenty-two days immediately preceding the caucus may be a delegate even though the elector has been affiliated with the political party for less than twenty-two days as shown in the statewide voter registration system. A delegate who moves from the precinct where registered during the twenty-one days prior to any caucus is ineligible to serve as a delegate from that precinct.

In each state senatorial and representative district comprised of all or parts of more than one county, persons elected at precinct caucuses as delegates to the county assemblies from precincts within the senatorial or representative district shall also serve as delegates to the senatorial and representative district assemblies if the senatorial or representative district central committee, by resolution adopted prior to the holding of the precinct caucuses in the year for which the resolution is to be effective, chooses to have the delegates to its district assembly in that year elected as provided in this subsection (6); except that selection of delegates under this subsection (6) shall be in conformance with the procedure established in the state party central committee's bylaws or rules. As a part of the resolution, the senatorial or representative central committee may determine the total number of delegate votes to be cast at the senatorial or representative district assembly, apportion them by county among the portions of the district which lie in separate counties upon an equitable basis determined by party bylaws or rules, and, upon the basis of the apportionment, determine the factor necessary to apportion equally among the delegates from the precincts within the district in each county the total votes to be cast by delegates from the portion of the district lying within that county.

Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary, a participant at a county assembly may participate remotely, including casting the participant's vote by e-mail, mail, telephone, or through an internet-based application if allowed by the party's rules.

Source:

L. 80:

Entire article R&RE, p. 326, § 1, effective January 1, 1981.

L. 82:

(5) amended, p. 217, § 2, effective February 19.

L. 85:

(1) amended, p. 256, § 8, effective May 31; (1) amended, p. 248, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 91:

(5) amended, p. 620, § 34, effective May 1.

L. 92:

Entire part amended, p. 679, § 6, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 94:

(5) amended, p. 1768, § 24, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 95:

(5) amended, p. 830, § 28, effective July 1.

L. 96:

(1), (2)(b), and (6) amended, p. 1738, § 20, effective July 1.

L. 98:

(1) amended, p. 633, § 5, effective May 6.

L. 99:

(1)(a), (4), and (5) amended, p. 763, § 21, effective May 20; (1)(a) amended, p. 100, § 2, effective August 4.

L. 2002:

(1)(a) and (4) amended, p. 133, § 4, effective March 27.

L. 2005:

(1)(a)(I) amended, p. 1398, § 15, effective June 6; (1)(a)(I) amended, p. 1433, § 15, effective June 6.

L. 2007:

(1)(a)(I) amended, p. 1989, § 4, effective August 3.

L. 2011:

(1)(a)(I) amended, (SB 11-189), ch. 243, p. 1063, § 8, effective May 27.

L. 2016:

(5) amended, (SB 16-142), ch. 173, p. 576, § 29, effective May 18.

L. 2019:

(5) amended, (HB 19-1278), ch. 326, p. 3010, § 17, effective August 2.

L. 2020:

(1)(a)(I) amended and (1)(a)(III) added, (HB 20-1359), ch. 23, p. 84, § 4, effective March 16.

L. 2021:

(1)(a)(I) amended and (1)(a)(IV) and (7) added, (SB 21-250), ch. 282, p. 1639, § 16, effective June 21.

1-4-603. Designation of major political party candidates by petition.

Candidates for major political party nominations for the offices specified in section 1-4-502 (1) that are to be made by primary election may be placed on the primary election ballot by petition, as provided in part 8 of this article.

Source:

L. 80:

Entire article R&RE, p. 328, § 1, effective January 1, 1981.

L. 83:

(3), (6), and (8) amended, p. 353, § 17, effective July 1.

L. 85:

(2)(a), (2)(b), (3), (4), and (8) amended and (2)(d) added, p. 257, § 9, effective May 31.

L. 88:

(2)(a) and (2)(b) amended, p. 297, § 2, effective January 1, 1989.

L. 89:

(3) amended and (5.5) and (9) added, p. 302, § 8, effective May 9.

L. 91:

(2) amended, p. 621, § 35, effective May 1.

L. 92:

Entire part amended, p. 681, § 6, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 98:

Entire section amended, p. 257, § 8, effective April 13.

L. 2000:

Entire section amended, p. 2028, § 3, effective August 2.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-14-207 as it existed prior to 1980.

1-4-604. Filing of petitions and certificates of designation by assembly - legislative declaration.

Every petition or certificate of designation by assembly in the case of a candidate for nomination for any national or state office specified in section 1-4-502 (1), or for member of the general assembly, district attorney, or district office greater than a county office, together with the written acceptances signed by the persons designated or nominated by such assembly described in section 1-4-601 (3), shall be filed by the presiding officer or secretary of such assembly and received in the office of the secretary of state.

A copy of each such certificate of designation shall be transmitted by the presiding officer or secretary of each assembly to the state central committee of the political party holding such assembly within three days after the adjournment of such assembly.

Every petition or certificate of designation by assembly in the case of a candidate for nomination for any elective office other than the offices specified in paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of this section shall be filed in the office of the county clerk and recorder of the county where the person is a candidate.

Certificates of designation by assembly shall be filed no later than four days after the adjournment of the assembly. Certificates of designation may be transmitted by facsimile transmission; however, the original certificate must also be filed and postmarked no later than ten days after the adjournment of the assembly.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 99, p. 764, § 22, effective May 20, 1999.)

Late filing of the certificate of designation shall not deprive candidates of their candidacy.

Except as provided in subsection (6)(a)(II) of this section, no later than four days after the adjournment of the assembly, the state central committee of each political party, utilizing the information described in subsection (1)(b) of this section, shall file with the secretary of state a compilation of the certificates of designation of each assembly that nominated candidates for any national or state office or for member of the general assembly, district attorney, or district office greater than a county office. Such a compilation of certificates of designation may be transmitted by facsimile transmission; however, the original compilation must also be filed and postmarked no later than ten days after the adjournment of the assembly.
(6) (a) (I) Except as provided in subsection (6)(a)(II) of this section, no later than four days after the adjournment of the assembly, the state central committee of each political party, utilizing the information described in subsection (1)(b) of this section, shall file with the secretary of state a compilation of the certificates of designation of each assembly that nominated candidates for any national or state office or for member of the general assembly, district attorney, or district office greater than a county office. Such a compilation of certificates of designation may be transmitted by facsimile transmission; however, the original compilation must also be filed and postmarked no later than ten days after the adjournment of the assembly.

Repealed.

The secretary of state shall compare such party compilation of certificates of designation with the certificates of designation filed by each such assembly with the secretary of state's office pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of this section. In the event that a certificate of designation appearing on such party compilation has not been filed pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of this section, the secretary of state shall notify the state central committee of such party not less than fifty-seven days before the primary election of an assembly's failure to file such certificate of designation.

A state central committee that receives notification pursuant to paragraph (b) of this subsection (6) shall file, or direct the presiding officer of the assembly to file, the certificate of designation, together with any written acceptances, not less than fifty-six days before the primary election.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that it is beneficial to improve the procedure and timeliness for communicating the designation of candidates for the primary election ballot by political party assemblies between the officers of such assemblies, the state central committee of each political party, and the secretary of state. The general assembly further finds that prescribing certain additional review processes for the documentation evidencing designations and nominations of candidates that are not onerous will serve to minimize the likelihood of a candidate being deprived of his or her candidacy and of an erroneous primary election ballot. The general assembly further encourages the responsible officials to engage in the enhanced communication and review described in this subsection (6) well in advance of statutorily prescribed deadlines or ballot certification dates, if possible, in order to maximize the time for giving notice and resolving any issues that may arise from the primary ballot nomination process.

Source:

L. 80:

Entire article R&RE, p. 329, § 1, effective January 1, 1981.

L. 81:

Entire section amended, p. 310, § 2, effective March 27.

L. 87:

Entire section amended, p. 287, § 9, effective June 26.

L. 89:

Entire section amended, p. 303, § 9, effective May 9.

L. 92:

Entire part amended, p. 682, § 6, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 99:

Entire section amended, p. 286, § 2, effective April 13; entire section amended, p. 764, § 22, effective May 20.

L. 2000:

(1)(a) amended, p. 2028, § 4, effective August 2.

L. 2020:

(6)(a) amended, (HB 20-1359), ch. 23, p. 85, § 5, effective March 16.

1-4-605. Order of names on primary ballot.

Candidates designated and certified by assembly for a particular office shall be placed on the primary election ballot in the order of the vote received at the assembly. The candidate receiving the highest vote shall be placed first in order on the ballot, followed by the candidate receiving the next highest vote, and so on until all of the candidates designated have been placed on the ballot. The names of two or more candidates receiving an equal number of votes for designation by assembly shall be placed on the primary ballot in the order determined by lot in accordance with section 1-4-601 (2). Candidates by petition for any particular office shall follow assembly candidates and shall be placed on the primary election ballot in an order established by lot.

Source:

L. 80:

Entire article R&RE, p. 329, § 1, effective January 1, 1981.

L. 85:

Entire section amended, p. 258, § 10, effective May 31.

L. 92:

Entire part amended, p. 683, § 6, effective January 1, 1993.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-14-209 as it existed prior to 1980.